Georgia statutes. TITLE 41 Nuisances
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

41-1-1.
Nuisance defined generally.

A nuisance is anything that causes hurt, inconvenience, or damage to another and the fact that the act done may otherwise be lawful shall not keep it from being a nuisance. The inconvenience complained of shall not be fanciful, or such as would affect only one of fastidious taste, but it shall be such as would affect an ordinary, reasonable man.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2942; Code 1868, § 2949; Code 1873, § 3000; Code 1882, § 3000; Civil Code 1895, § 3861; Civil Code 1910, § 4457; Code 1933, § 72-101.

Cross references.

Regulation of fireworks, T. 25, C. 10.

Causes of action and remedies for injuries to real estate, T. 51, C. 9.

Law reviews.

For article, “Recommendations Regarding Control of Outdoor Advertising Along the Interstate Highway System in Georgia,” see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 308 (1963).

For article discussing Georgia’s practice of exposing municipalities to tort liability through the use of nuisance law, see 12 Ga. St. B. J. 11 (1975).

For article discussing nuisances as “Hidden Liens,” see 14 Ga. St. B.J. 32 (1977).

For survey article on real property law for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 397 (2003).

For annual survey of zoning and land use law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2005) and 58 Mercer L. Rev. 477 (2006).

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 493 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2008).

For note, “Town of Fort Oglethorpe v. Phillips: A Clarification of Georgia’s Public Nuisance Law?”, see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 474 (1969).

For note analyzing sovereign immunity in this state and proposing implementation of a waiver scheme and creation of a court of claims pursuant to Ga. Const. 1976, Art. VI, Sec. V, Para. I, see 27 Emory L.J. 717 (1978).

For comment on Collins v. Lanier,

201 Ga. 527

,

40 S.E.2d 424

(1946), see 9 Ga. B. J. 325 (1947).

For comment on Gatewood v. Hansford,

75 Ga. App. 567

,

44 S.E.2d 126

(1947), see 10 Ga. B.J. 372 (1948).

For comment on Bennett v. Bagwell & Stewart,

214 Ga. 115

,

103 S.E.2d 561

(1958), holding that as a nuisance is a continuing trespass, a court in equity will enjoin it in the county of the resident defendant even though he is only an agent or employee of the nonresident defendant, see 21 Ga. B.J. 564 (1959).

41-1-2.
Classes of nuisances; public and private nuisances defined.

Nuisances are either public or private. A public nuisance is one which damages all persons who come within the sphere of its operation, though it may vary in its effects on individuals. A private nuisance is one limited in its injurious effects to one or a few individuals.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2939; Code 1868, § 2946; Code 1873, § 2997; Code 1882, § 2997; Civil Code 1895, § 3858; Civil Code 1910, § 4454; Code 1933, § 72-102.

Cross references.

When infraction of public duty gives cause of action to individual, § 51-1-7.

Law reviews.

For article discussing federal liability for pollution abatement in condemnation actions, see 17 Mercer L. Rev. 364 (1966).

For note, “Town of Fort Oglethorpe v. Phillips: A Clarification of Georgia’s Public Nuisance Law?,” see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 474 (1969).

For note discussing the abatement of nonconforming uses as nuisances, see 10 Ga. St. B.J. 302 (1973).

For article discussing Georgia’s practice of exposing municipalities to tort liability through the use of nuisance law, see 12 Ga. St. B. J. 11 (1975).

For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005) and 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006).

41-1-3.
Right of action for public nuisance generally.

A public nuisance generally gives no right of action to any individual. However, if a public nuisance in which the public does not participate causes special damage to an individual, such special damage shall give a right of action.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 2939, 2940; Code 1868, §§ 2946, 2947; Code 1873, §§ 2997, 2998; Code 1882, §§ 2997, 2998; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3858, 3859; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4454, 4455; Code 1933, § 72-103.

Cross references.

Penalty for maintaining house in which gaming, drinking, or other misbehavior occurs, or which presents common disturbance to neighborhood, §

16-11-44

.

When infraction of public duty gives cause of action to individual, § 51-1-7.

Law reviews.

For note, “Town of Fort Oglethorpe v. Phillips: A Clarification of Georgia’s Public Nuisance Law?,” see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 474 (1969).

For note discussing the abatement of nonconforming uses as nuisances, see 10 Ga. St. B.J. 302 (1973).

For article discussing Georgia’s practice of exposing municipalities to tort liability through the use of nuisance law, see 12 Ga. St. B. J. 11 (1975).

For article surveying Georgia cases dealing with environment, natural resources, and land use from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 75 (1978).

41-1-4.
Right of action for private nuisance generally.

A private nuisance may injure either a person or property, or both, and for that injury a right of action accrues to the person who is injured or whose property is damaged.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 2939, 2941; Code 1868, §§ 2946, 2948; Code 1873, §§ 2997, 2999; Code 1882, §§ 2997, 2999; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3858, 3860; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4454, 4456; Code 1933, § 72-104.

Law reviews.

For note discussing nuisance action as a remedy for damage caused by sonic booms, see 2 Ga. L. Rev. 83 (1967).

For note, “Town of Fort Oglethorpe v. Phillips: A Clarification of Georgia’s Public Nuisance Law?,” see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 474 (1969).

41-1-5.
Right of action of alienee of injured property for continuance of nuisance; necessity for request to abate nuisance.

The alienee of a person owning property injured may maintain an action for continuance of the nuisance for which the alienee of the property causing the nuisance is responsible.

Prior to commencement of an action by the alienee of the property injured against the alienee of the property causing the nuisance, there must be a request to abate the nuisance.

History.

Code 1863, § 2943; Code 1868, § 2950; Code 1873, § 3001; Code 1882, § 3001; Civil Code 1895, § 3862; Civil Code 1910, § 4458; Code 1933, § 72-105; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 41.

Cross references.

Covenants and warranties relating to land transactions generally, §

44-5-60

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article discussing nuisances as “Hidden Liens,” see 14 Ga. St. B.J. 32 (1977).

For annual survey on real property, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 255 (2012).

41-1-6.
Erection or continuance of nuisance after notice to abate.

Any person who shall erect or continue after notice to abate a nuisance which tends to annoy the community, injure the health of the citizens in general, or corrupt the public morals shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1833, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 817; Code 1863, § 4437; Code 1868, § 4478; Code 1873, § 4562; Code 1882, § 4562; Penal Code 1895, § 641; Penal Code 1910, § 681; Code 1933, § 72-9901.

Cross references.

Offenses against public health and morals generally, T. 16, C. 12.

41-1-7.
Treatment of agricultural facilities and operations and forest land as nuisances.

It is the declared policy of the state to conserve, protect, and encourage the development and improvement of its agricultural and forest land and facilities for the production or distribution of food and other agricultural products, including without limitation forest products. When nonagricultural land uses extend into agricultural or agriculture-supporting industrial or commercial areas or forest land or when there are changed conditions in or around the locality of an agricultural facility or agricultural support facility, such operations often become the subject of nuisance actions. As a result, such facilities are sometimes forced to cease operations. Many others are discouraged from making investments in agricultural support facilities or farm improvements or adopting new related technology or methods. It is the purpose of this Code section to reduce losses of the state’s agricultural and forest land resources by limiting the circumstances under which agricultural facilities and operations or agricultural support facilities may be deemed to be a nuisance.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Agricultural facility” includes, but is not limited to, any land, building, structure, pond, impoundment, appurtenance, machinery, or equipment which is used for the commercial production or processing of crops, livestock, animals, poultry, honeybees, honeybee products, livestock products, poultry products, timber, forest products, or products which are used in commercial aquaculture. Such term shall also include any farm labor camp or facilities for migrant farm workers.

“Agricultural operation” means:

The plowing, tilling, or preparation of soil at an agricultural facility;

The planting, growing, fertilizing, harvesting, or otherwise maintaining of crops as defined in Code Section 1-3-3 and also timber and trees that are grown for purposes other than for harvest and for sale;

The application of pesticides, herbicides, or other chemicals, compounds, or substances to crops, weeds, or soil in connection with the production of crops, timber, livestock, animals, or poultry;

The breeding, hatching, raising, producing, feeding, keeping, slaughtering, or processing of livestock, hogs, equines, chickens, turkeys, poultry or other fowl normally raised for food, mules, cattle, sheep, goats, dogs, rabbits, or similar farm animals for commercial purposes;

The production and keeping of honeybees, the production of honeybee products, and honeybee processing facilities;

The production, processing, or packaging of eggs or egg products;

The manufacturing of feed for poultry or livestock;

The rotation of crops, including without limitation timber production;

Commercial aquaculture;

The application of existing, changed, or new technology, practices, processes, or procedures to any agricultural operation; and

The operation of any roadside market.

“Agricultural support facility” means any food processing plant or forest products processing plant together with all related or ancillary activities, including trucking; provided, however, that this term expressly excludes any rendering plant facility or operation.

“Concentrated Animal Feeding Operation,” or “CAFO,” means the same as that term is used pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of 40 C.F.R. Section 122.23.

“Food processing plant” means a commercial operation that manufactures, packages, labels, distributes, or stores food for human consumption and does not provide food directly to a consumer.

“Forest products processing plant” means a commercial operation that manufactures, packages, labels, distributes, or stores any forest product or that manufactures, packages, labels, distributes, or stores any building material made from gypsum rock.

“Rendering plant” has the meaning provided by Code Section 4-4-40.

No private nuisance action shall be filed against any agricultural facility, agricultural operation, any agricultural operation at an agricultural facility, agricultural support facility, or any operation at an agricultural support facility unless the plaintiff legally possesses the real property affected by the conditions alleged to be a nuisance.

No agricultural facility, agricultural operation, any agricultural operation at an agricultural facility, agricultural support facility, or any operation at an agricultural support facility shall be or shall become a nuisance, either public or private if the facility or operation has been in operation for two years or more. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply when a nuisance results from the negligent, improper, or illegal operation of any such facility or operation.

For purposes of this Code section, the established date of operation is the date on which an agricultural operation or agricultural support facility commenced operation. If the physical facilities of the agricultural operation or the agricultural support facility are subsequently expanded or new technology adopted, the established date of operation for each change is not a separately and independently established date of operation and the commencement of the expanded operation does not divest the agricultural operation or agricultural support facility of a previously established date of operation.

For purposes of this Code section, the commencement of operation of a CAFO shall create a separately and independently established date of operation for that portion of the agricultural facility, agricultural operation, any agricultural operation at an agricultural facility, agricultural support facility, or any operation at an agricultural support facility relating to the newly established CAFO.

Nothing in this Code section shall preempt or override any present or future rule or regulation of the Georgia Environmental Protection Division or the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1253, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1775, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 317, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 817, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 681, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 267, § 1/SB 101; Ga. L. 2022, p. 87, § 2/HB 1150.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote subsection (b); added subsections (c), (f), and (g); redesignated former subsections (c) and (d) as present subsections (d) and (e), respectively; and, in the first sentence in subsection (d), deleted “, as a result of changed conditions in or around the locality of such facility or operation” following “private” and substituted “two years” for “one year”.

Cross references.

Legislative declaration of intent to encourage development and operation of new family farms through establishment of Georgia Residential Finance Authority, §

8-3-171

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, the correct spelling of “technology” was substituted in the second sentence of subsection (d).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “however, that this” was substituted for “however, this” paragraph (b)(3.1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 87, § 1/HB 1150, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Freedom to Farm Act.’”

Law reviews.

For article, “Agricultural Nuisances and the Georgia ‘Right to Farm’ Law,” see 23 Ga. St. B.J. 19 (1986).

For article, “Agricultural Nuisances Under the Amended Georgia ‘Right-to-Farm’ Law,” see 25 Ga. St. B.J. 36 (1988).

41-1-8.
Treatment of publicly owned cultural facilities as nuisances.

It is declared the public policy of this state to conserve, protect, and encourage the development of publicly owned cultural facilities. In order to encourage the establishment and maintenance of publicly owned cultural facilities, it is the purpose of this Code section to limit the circumstances under which a publicly owned cultural facility may be deemed to be a nuisance.

Neither a publicly owned cultural facility nor a facility operated on lease from a publicly owned cultural facility nor any of the appurtenances thereof nor the operation thereof shall be or become a nuisance, either public or private, solely as a result of changed conditions in or around the locality of such cultural facility if such cultural facility has been in operation for one year or more.

History.

Code 1981, §

41-1-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 999, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 41.

41-1-9.
Sport shooting ranges.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Person” means an individual, proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or unincorporated association.

“Sport shooting range” or “range” means an area designated and operated by a person for the sport shooting of firearms and not available for such use by the general public without payment of a fee, membership contribution, or dues or by invitation of an authorized person, or any area so designated and operated by a unit of government, regardless of the terms of admission thereto.

“Unit of government” means any of the departments, agencies, authorities, or political subdivisions of the state, cities, municipal corporations, townships, or villages and any of their respective departments, agencies, or authorities.

No sport shooting range shall be or shall become a nuisance, either public or private, solely as a result of changed conditions in or around the locality of such range if the range has been in operation for one year since the date on which it commenced operation as a sport shooting range. Subsequent physical expansion of the range or expansion of the types of firearms in use at the range shall not establish a new date of commencement of operations for purposes of this Code section.

No sport shooting range or unit of government or person owning, operating, or using a sport shooting range for the sport shooting of firearms shall be subject to any action for civil or criminal liability, damages, abatement, or injunctive relief resulting from or relating to noise generated by the operation of the range if the range remains in compliance with noise control or nuisance abatement rules, regulations, statutes, or ordinances applicable to the range on the date on which it commenced operation.

No rules, regulations, statutes, or ordinances relating to noise control, noise pollution, or noise abatement adopted or enacted by a unit of government shall be applied retroactively to prohibit conduct at a sport shooting range, which conduct was lawful and being engaged in prior to the adoption or enactment of such rules, regulations, statutes, or ordinances.

History.

Code 1981, §

41-1-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 796, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 796, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to conduct occurring on or after July 1, 1997, and provides that this Code section shall not apply to or affect conduct occurring prior to July 1, 1997.

41-1-10.
Hunting operations not nuisances under certain conditions.

As used in this Code section, the term “hunting operation” means an operation including any of the following:

Lands, including the buildings and improvements thereon, which are used or which are intended for use as a hunting club, hunting preserve, or shooting preserve;

Lands, including the buildings and improvements thereon, which are used or which are intended for use as a kennel, training facility, or field trial facility for the breeding, showing, raising or training of hunting and sporting dogs; or

Clubs, associations, partnerships, sole proprietorships, corporations and other business and social entities whose activities or holdings include the lands and uses described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection.

No hunting operation shall be or shall become a nuisance, either public or private, solely as a result of changed conditions in or around the locality of such hunting operation if the hunting operation has been in operation for at least one year since the date on which it commenced activity as a hunting operation. Subsequent physical expansion of the hunting operation shall not establish a new date of commencement of activity for purposes of this Code section.

No hunting operation shall be subject to any action for civil or criminal liability, damages, abatement, or injunctive relief resulting from or relating to lawful hunting activities generated by the hunting operation if the hunting operation remains in compliance with Title 27 and the rules and regulations adopted by the Board of Natural Resources pursuant to Title 27.

This Code section shall not apply to hunting operations which are conducted in violation of any provision of Title 27 or the rules and regulations adopted by the Board of Natural Resources pursuant to Title 27.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-1-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 11/SB 474.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to signs for privately owned businesses. The former Code section was based on Code 1981, §

41-1-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1196, § 5.1 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 41, effective April 18, 2002.